Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.314

Person causing hazardous materials incident—Responsibility for incident clean-up—Liability.

(1) Any person transporting hazardous materials shall clean up any hazardous materials incident that occurs during transportation, and shall take such additional action as may be reasonably necessary after consultation with the designated incident command agency in order to achieve compliance with all applicable federal and state laws and regulations.

Any person transporting hazardous materials that is responsible for causing a hazardous materials incident, as defined in RCW 70.136.020, other than the operating employees of a transportation company, is liable to the state or any political subdivision thereof for extraordinary costs incurred by the state or the political subdivision in the course of protecting the public from actual or threatened harm resulting from the hazardous materials incident.

(2) Any person, other than a person transporting hazardous materials or an operating employee of a company, responsible for causing a hazardous materials incident, as defined in RCW 70.136.020, is liable to a municipal fire department or fire district for extraordinary costs incurred by the municipal fire department or fire district, in the course of protecting the public from actual or threatened harm resulting from the hazardous materials incident, until the incident oversight is assumed by the department of ecology.

(3) "Extraordinary costs" as used in this section means those reasonable and necessary costs incurred by a governmental entity in the course of protecting life and property that exceed the normal and usual expenses anticipated for police and fire protection, emergency services, and public works. These shall include, but not be limited to, overtime for public employees, unusual fuel consumption requirements, any loss or damage to publicly owned equipment, and the purchase or lease of any special equipment or services required to protect the public during the hazardous materials incident.

[ 1989 c 406 s 1; 1984 c 165 s 3.]